Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1437XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1437XD (15) 91
nls/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
FINANCIAL LITERACY AND FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION
Section 1. Section 502.410, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. Agents. The fee for an individual is forty dollars
when filing an application for registration as an agent, a fee
of forty dollars when filing a renewal of registration as an
agent, and a fee of forty dollars when filing for a change of
registration as an agent. Of each forty-dollar fee collected,
ten dollars is appropriated to the securities investor
education and financial literacy training fund established
under financial literacy and investor education fund created
in section 502.601, subsection 5 546.14, and ten dollars is
appropriated to the financial exploitation prevention fund
created in section 546.15. If the filing results in a denial
or withdrawal, the administrator shall retain the fee.
Sec. 2. Section 502.601, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the
following:
4. Financial literacy and investor education. Initiatives
involving financial literacy and investor education shall
comply with the initiatives in section 546.14, subsection 1,
and section 546.15, subsection 1.
Sec. 3. Section 502.601, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 4. Section 505.7, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Forty percent of the nonexamination Nonexamination
revenues payable to the division of insurance or the department
of revenue in connection with the regulation of insurance
companies or other entities subject to the regulatory
jurisdiction of the division shall be deposited in the commerce
revolving fund created in section 546.12 and shall be subject
to annual appropriation to the division for its operations
and is also subject to expenditure under subsection 6. The
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-1- nls/ko 1/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
remaining nonexamination revenues payable to the division of
insurance or the department of revenue shall be deposited in
the general fund of the state.
Sec. 5. Section 546.2, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. g. To identify and coordinate appropriate
opportunities for collaboration under sections 546.14 and
546.15 with the chief administrative officers of each division
and each chief administrative officer’s respective regulated
entities.
Sec. 6. NEW SECTION. 546.14 Financial literacy and investor
education fund.
1. The director shall develop and implement financial
literacy and investor education initiatives for the public by
providing education on financial topics, including but not
limited to the topics required to be offered and taught for
grades nine through twelve under section 256.11, subsection 5,
paragraph “k”, subparagraph (1).
2. A financial literacy and investor education fund is
created in the state treasury under the control of the director
for the purposes specified in subsection 1. The fund shall
consist of any moneys appropriated to the fund by the general
assembly and any other moneys available and obtained or
accepted by the department for placement in the fund including
all of the following:
a. Moneys appropriated to the fund pursuant to section
502.410, subsection 2.
b. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
the director may, at the director’s discretion, transfer up to
two hundred fifty thousand dollars from the commerce revolving
fund created in section 546.12 to complete the objectives under
subsection 1.
c. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
any moneys received by the department by reason of civil
penalties assessed pursuant to chapter 502 may be deposited
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-2- nls/ko 2/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
in the financial literacy and investor education fund at the
discretion of the director.
d. The director may collaborate with organizations with an
interest in financial literacy and investor education. The
director may accept a grant or donation to be placed in the
financial literacy and investor education fund.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
moneys in the financial literacy and investor education fund
may be transferred to the financial exploitation prevention
fund in section 546.15 at the discretion of the director.
4. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or
earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this
section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of
a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for
expenditure for the purposes designated.
Sec. 7. NEW SECTION. 546.15 Financial exploitation
prevention fund.
1. The director shall develop and implement initiatives to
accomplish all of the following:
a. Educate the public on financial exploitation.
b. Assist individuals who are known, suspected, or potential
victims of financial exploitation.
c. Conduct investigations, refer investigations to other law
enforcement, and assist in the prosecution of persons involved
in financial exploitation.
2. A financial exploitation prevention fund is created
in the state treasury under the control of the director and
consists of any moneys appropriated to the fund by the general
assembly for the purposes of subsection 1, and any other moneys
available and obtained or accepted by the department for
placement in the fund including all of the following:
a. Moneys appropriated to the fund pursuant to section
502.410, subsection 2.
b. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-3- nls/ko 3/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
director may, at the director’s discretion, transfer up to two
hundred fifty thousand dollars from the commerce revolving fund
to complete the objectives of this section.
c. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
any moneys received by the department as a result of civil
penalties assessed pursuant to chapter 502 may be placed into
the financial exploitation prevention fund at the discretion of
the director.
d. The director may collaborate with organizations with an
interest in financial exploitation prevention and education.
e. The director may accept a grant or donation to be placed
in the financial exploitation prevention fund.
3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or
earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this
section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of
a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for
expenditure for the purposes designated.
4. a. All investigation files, investigation reports,
and all other investigative information in the possession of
the department pursuant to this section shall be confidential
records under chapter 22, except as specifically provided in
this section, and shall not be subject to release by discovery,
subpoena, or other means of legal compulsion until opened for
public inspection by the department, or upon the consent of
the department, or until a court of competent jurisdiction
determines, after notice to the department and hearing,
that the department will not be unnecessarily hindered in
accomplishing the purposes of this section if opened for public
inspection. Investigative information in the possession of
the department may be disclosed, in the director’s discretion,
to appropriate regulatory or law enforcement agencies within
the state, another state, the District of Columbia, or another
territory or country.
b. The director may share documents, materials, or other
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-4- nls/ko 4/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
information, including confidential and privileged documents,
materials, or other information, with any person provided
that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidential
and privileged status of the document, material, or other
information pursuant to Iowa law.
c. The director may receive documents, materials, or other
information, including confidential and privileged documents,
materials, or other information from any person and shall
maintain as confidential and privileged any document, material,
or other information received with notice or the understanding
that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the
jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or
other information.
d. The director may enter into an agreement governing the
sharing and use of documents, materials, or other information
consistent with this section.
e. An investigator or other staff member of the department
shall not be subject to subpoena in a civil action concerning
any matter of which the department investigator or other staff
member has knowledge pursuant to a pending or continuing
investigation conducted by the department pursuant to this
chapter.
Sec. 8. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. On the effective date of this
division of this Act, any unencumbered and unobligated moneys
remaining in the securities investor education and financial
literacy training fund created in section 502.601 shall be
transferred to the financial literacy and investor education
fund created in section 546.14, as enacted in this division of
this Act.
DIVISION II
TAX ON GROSS PREMIUMS —— CONFIDENTIALITY
Sec. 9. Section 432.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 7. a. A tax return filed under this
section shall not be subject to inspection under chapter 22.
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-5- nls/ko 5/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
It shall be unlawful for any present or former officer or
employee of the state to willfully or recklessly publish any
tax return filed under this section. A person who violates
this paragraph shall be guilty of a serious misdemeanor and, in
addition to any other penalty, shall be dismissed from state
office or discharged from state employment.
b. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the
department of revenue from turning over information and tax
returns in the department of revenue’s possession pursuant
to this subsection to duly authorized officers of the United
States, or tax officials of other states, pursuant to an
agreement between the commissioner of insurance and any of the
following:
(1) The secretary of the treasury of the United States, or
the secretary’s delegate.
(2) The commissioner of insurance of another state.
Sec. 10. Section 432.1A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 8. a. A tax return filed under this
section shall not be subject to inspection under chapter 22.
It shall be unlawful for any present or former officer or
employee of the state to willfully or recklessly publish any
tax return filed under this section. A person who violates
this paragraph shall be guilty of a serious misdemeanor and, in
addition to any other penalty, shall be dismissed from state
office or discharged from state employment.
b. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the
department of revenue from turning over information and
tax returns in the department’s possession pursuant to this
subsection to duly authorized officers of the United States, or
tax officials of other states, pursuant to an agreement between
the commissioner of insurance and any of the following:
(1) The secretary of the treasury of the United States, or
the secretary’s delegate.
(2) The commissioner of insurance of another state.
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-6- nls/ko 6/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION III
HEALTH INSURANCE RATE INCREASES —— PUBLIC HEARINGS
Sec. 11. Section 505.19, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The commissioner shall may hold a public hearing
at the time a carrier files for proposed health insurance
rate increases exceeding the average annual health spending
growth rate as provided in subsection 1, prior to approval or
disapproval of the proposed rate increases for that carrier by
the commissioner.
DIVISION IV
HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNTS AND QUALIFIED HIGH-DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH
PLANS —— COST-SHARING
Sec. 12. NEW SECTION. 509.3B Health savings accounts and
qualified high-deductible health plans —— cost-sharing.
If a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible paid as
cost-sharing by an enrollee under this chapter may result in
the enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account
associated with the enrollee’s qualified high-deductible
health plan under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code,
the cost-sharing shall apply only to the enrollee’s qualified
high-deductible health plan after the enrollee satisfies the
enrollee’s minimum deductible, except for items or services
determined to be preventive care under section 223(c)(2)(C) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
Sec. 13. NEW SECTION. 514A.3C Health savings accounts and
qualified high-deductible health plans —— cost-sharing.
If a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible paid as
cost-sharing by an enrollee under this chapter may result in
the enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account
associated with the enrollee’s qualified high-deductible
health plan under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code,
the cost-sharing shall apply only to the enrollee’s qualified
high-deductible health plan after the enrollee satisfies the
enrollee’s minimum deductible, except for items or services
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-7- nls/ko 7/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
determined to be preventive care under section 223(c)(2)(C) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
DIVISION V
INSURANCE COMPANY WITHDRAWAL REQUIREMENTS
Sec. 14. NEW SECTION. 505.36 Insurer —— withdrawal
requirements.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
a. “Commissioner” means the commissioner of insurance.
b. “Insurer” means an insurance company, an affiliate of
an insurance company, or other legal entity authorized to
engage in the business of insurance in this state, including
a reciprocal exchange, an interinsurance exchange, and a
lloyd’s plan. “Insurer” does not include an eligible surplus
lines insurer under chapter 515I, a county mutual insurance
association under chapter 518, a state mutual insurance
association under chapter 518A, an entity offering health
coverage, or an entity offering accident and sickness coverage.
2. Exemption. This section shall not apply to a transfer of
business from one insurer to another insurer if the insurer to
whom the business is being transferred is all of the following:
a. Within the same insurance holding company system as the
insurer from whom business is being transferred.
b. Authorized to engage in the business of insurance in this
state.
c. Not a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, a lloyd’s
plan, a state mutual insurance association, or a county mutual
insurance association.
3. Withdrawal plan required.
a. An insurer shall file a withdrawal plan with the
commissioner in any of the following circumstances:
(1) The insurer intends to reduce the insurer’s total annual
premium volume in the state by fifty percent or more.
(2) The insurer intends to reduce the insurer’s total annual
premium in the state in a line of insurance by seventy-five
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-8- nls/ko 8/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
percent or more.
(3) The insurer intends to reduce the insurer’s total annual
premium volume in the state in a line of private passenger
automobile insurance, homeowners insurance, or dwelling
property insurance by fifty percent or more.
b. If an insurer intends to restrict writing new business
in the state, but not to an extent that requires the insurer
to file a plan for orderly withdrawal under paragraph “a”, the
insurer shall provide prior written notice to the commissioner
of the insurer’s intent to restrict writing new business in the
state.
4. Withdrawal plan.
a. A withdrawal plan filed under this section shall provide
for all of the following:
(1) The insurer fulfilling all contractual obligations.
(2) The insurer providing service to all policyholders and
claimants.
(3) The insurer meeting all statutory obligations,
including but not limited to payment of assessments to the
guaranty fund and participation in an assigned risk plan.
b. A withdrawal plan filed pursuant to this section shall,
at a minimum, include all of the following:
(1) The date on which the insurer proposes to commence
execution of the withdrawal plan, and the date on which
execution of the withdrawal plan will be completed.
(2) The reason for withdrawal for each line of insurance.
(3) Each policy form by number, and all of the following
information:
(a) The total number of policyholders.
(b) The total amount of premiums impacted for each line of
insurance.
(4) The total number of insurance producers impacted for
each line of insurance.
(5) A copy of the notification the insurer will provide to
each impacted insurance producer.
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-9- nls/ko 9/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(6) A copy of the notification or nonrenewal the insurer
will provide to each impacted policyholder.
(7) Details regarding the insurer’s fulfillment of
contractual obligations to the insurer’s policyholders during
the withdrawal.
(8) Whether replacement coverage will be provided to a
policyholder and, if so, the insurer shall provide all of the
following:
(a) The insurer’s relationship with the replacing insurer.
(b) The underwriting requirements and rates that will be
used to underwrite the policyholder.
(9) An estimate of the percentage of the Iowa market
affected by withdrawal.
(10) Any third-party contracts that provide for continuity
of coverage for policyholders.
(11) A list of the lines of insurance that the insurer will
continue to offer in the state.
5. Commissioner approval.
a. Except as provided in paragraph “b”, the commissioner
shall approve a withdrawal plan that has been determined to
meet all of the following requirements:
(1) The withdrawal plan provides a minimum of one hundred
eighty calendar days’ notice to the commissioner.
(2) The withdrawal plan includes notice to policyholders as
required by chapter 515.
(3) The withdrawal plan complies with subsection 4.
b. If the commissioner finds that a withdrawal plan does
not comply with paragraph “a”, the commissioner may modify,
restrict, limit, or deny the withdrawal plan.
c. An insurer may request a hearing within thirty calendar
days of the commissioner’s decision to modify, restrict, limit,
or deny the insurer’s withdrawal plan. A hearing under this
paragraph shall be held within sixty calendar days of the
insurer’s request unless a later date is agreed to by the
insurer and the commissioner, or permitted by the commissioner
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-10- nls/ko 10/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
for good cause.
6. Resumption of writing insurance after withdrawal. An
insurer that withdraws from writing all lines of insurance
in the state shall not, without prior approval of the
commissioner, resume writing insurance in the state for a
minimum of five years from the date of completion of the
insurer’s withdrawal.
7. Remedies. A violation of this section shall constitute
an unfair method of competition and unfair or deceptive act or
practice under section 507B.4.
8. Rules. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 17A as necessary to administer and enforce this
section.
Sec. 15. Section 507B.4, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. v. Improper withdrawal of an
insurer. Failure of an insurer to comply with section
505.36. As used in this paragraph, “insurer” means the same as
defined in section 505.36, subsection 1.
DIVISION VI
REPLACEMENT COST, ACTUAL CASH VALUE, AND LINE OF SIGHT
Sec. 16. NEW SECTION. 515.116 Line of sight.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
a. “Actual cash value” means the replacement cost of
property at the time of loss, less depreciation, if any.
b. “Line of sight” means any location a reasonable person
would stand, on the ground or any floor of an insured’s damaged
structure, to view, without obstruction or the use of aerial
tools or technology, the damaged area of the interior or
exterior of the damaged structure from a reasonable distance.
“Line of sight” is not limited to a view of the insured’s
damaged structure from the location at which the damage
occurred.
c. “Reasonable distance” means, for exterior repair or
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-11- nls/ko 11/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
replacement, a vantage point approximately thirty feet from
where the repair or replacement is to occur. A “reasonable
distance” for interior repair or replacement means a vantage
point approximately five feet from where the repair or
replacement is to occur. Based on a particular property,
“reasonable distance” may be determined to be greater than or
less than thirty feet for exterior repair, or greater than or
less than five feet for interior repair.
d. “Reasonably similar appearance” means if, within a line
of sight, a person viewing the repaired or replaced property
would find the property to resemble the property’s preloss
condition. Whether a replacement results in a reasonably
similar appearance is a fact-specific determination made
on a case-by-case basis considering the totality of the
circumstances.
e. “Reasonably similar product” means a product of like
kind, quality, color, and size. “Reasonably similar product”
does not mean an exact match.
2. Replacement cost. For an insurance policy providing
for the adjustment and settlement of first-party losses based
on replacement cost, unless the insurance policy, a rider, or
an endorsement specifically provides otherwise, all of the
following shall apply:
a. When a loss requires repair or replacement of a product
or part, consequential physical damage incurred during the
repair or replacement of the product or part, not otherwise
excluded by the policy, shall be included in the calculation of
loss. The insured shall not be required to pay for betterment
or other costs, except for any applicable deductible.
b. When a loss requires replacement of a product and the
product to be replaced remains available for purchase, the
identical product shall be used to repair or replace the
damaged product, even if the undamaged existing product shows
discoloration due to age or normal wear and tear. If the
identical product is not available for purchase, the insurer
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-12- nls/ko 12/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
shall use a reasonably similar product to achieve a reasonably
similar appearance.
3. Actual cash value. For an insurance policy providing
for adjustment and settlement of first-party losses based on
actual cash value, unless the insurance policy, a rider, or
an endorsement specifically provides otherwise, all of the
following shall apply:
a. For residential fire and extended coverage, the insurer
shall determine the actual cash value. The insurer shall
provide a copy of the claim file worksheet detailing all
deductions for depreciation. Upon request by the insured, the
insurer shall provide a detailed written explanation of the
manner in which depreciation was calculated.
b. Where the insured’s interest is limited because
damaged property has nominal or no economic value, or a value
disproportionate to replacement cost less depreciation, a
determination of actual cash value shall not be required. At
the request of the insured, the insurer shall provide a written
explanation of the basis for limiting the amount of recovery,
the amount payable under the policy, and the manner in which
actual cash value was determined.
DIVISION VII
SERVICE COMPANIES, SERVICE CONTRACTS, AND LICENSES
Sec. 17. Section 507B.4, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. v. Service contracts. Failure of a person
in the business of service contracts to comply with chapter
523C.
Sec. 18. Section 523C.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 1A. “Communicating in a verifiable manner”
means communication by in-person delivery, email, or, if there
is an auditable record of the communication, by telephone.
NEW SUBSECTION. 6A. “Person” means an individual or a
business entity.
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-13- nls/ko 13/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
NEW SUBSECTION. 12A. “Service contract holder” means the
original purchaser of a service contract or the successor in
interest or transferee entitled to services under the service
contract.
NEW SUBSECTION. 12B. “Substitute part” means a part that is
not issued by the original part manufacturer, including but not
limited to a remanufactured part, an aftermarket part, and a
part obtained from a salvage yard.
NEW SUBSECTION. 12C. “Support services” means a person that
provides services that support, or a person that works under
the direction of, a licensed service company in connection with
the issuance, offer for sale, sale, or administration of a
service contract in this state, including but not limited to a
person that provides marketing, administrative, or technical
support to a service company.
Sec. 19. Section 523C.1, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
4. “Motor vehicle” means any vehicle that is self-propelled
vehicle and subject to registration under chapter 321 or
chapter 321I.
Sec. 20. Section 523C.2, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
523C.2 License required.
1. A person that shall be contractually obligated to the
service contract holder under the terms of the service contract
shall not directly or indirectly issue, offer for sale, or
sell a motor vehicle service contract or residential service
contract in this state unless the person is a licensed service
company.
2. This chapter shall not apply to any person that provides
support services. A service company that utilizes support
services shall ensure the support services’ compliance with the
issuance, offer for sale, or sale of a service contract under
this chapter.
3. A service company shall maintain a license for the
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-14- nls/ko 14/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
duration of time that the service company is contractually
obligated to a service contract holder under the terms of a
service contract.
4. A service company shall report to the commissioner
within thirty calendar days any material change to the
information submitted by the service company in the service
company’s initial license application, or license renewal
application, including a change in the service company’s
contact information, ownership, officers or directors directly
responsible for the provider’s service contract business,
or any other change that substantially affects the service
company’s operations in the state.
5. A service company shall report to the commissioner any
administrative action taken against the service company in
another jurisdiction within thirty calendar days of the final
disposition. The report shall include a copy of the order,
consent to the order, and other relevant legal documents.
6. Within thirty calendar days of the initial pretrial
hearing date, a service company shall report to the
commissioner a criminal prosecution in any jurisdiction of an
owner with more than a ten percent ownership stake, an officer,
or a director directly responsible for the service contract
business of the service company, for an offense involving
dishonesty or a false statement including but not limited
to fraud, theft, misappropriation of funds, falsification
of documents, deceptive acts or practices, or other related
offenses. The report shall include a copy of the initial
complaint filed, the order resulting from the hearing, and any
other relevant legal documents.
Sec. 21. Section 523C.3, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
523C.3 Application for license.
1. Application for a license as a service company
shall be filed with the commissioner on a form approved
by the commissioner and shall include all of the following
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-15- nls/ko 15/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
information:
a. The name and principal address of the applicant.
b. The state of incorporation of the applicant.
c. The name and address of the applicant’s registered agent
for service of process in Iowa.
d. The legal name of all of the following:
(1) Each owner of the service company that has a greater
than ten percent ownership stake in the service company.
(2) Each officer of the service company.
(3) Each director directly responsible for the business of
the service company.
e. A certificate of good standing for the applicant issued
by the secretary of state and dated not more than thirty
calendar days from the date of the application.
f. Evidence of compliance with section 523C.5.
g. A copy of each motor vehicle service contract form to be
used, issued, or offered for sale in this state by the service
company.
h. A copy of each residential service contract form to be
used, issued, or offered for sale in this state by the service
company.
i. A national association of insurance commissioners’
biographical affidavit and the verification of the biographical
affidavit for the chief executive officer and chief financial
officer of the service company, or for the individuals in
the equivalent positions. The service company shall use a
third-party vendor from a list of vendors approved by the
commissioner to verify the biographical affidavits. The
service company shall pay all costs associated with the
required verifications.
j. A list of any disciplinary actions taken against the
service company, or any of the service company’s owners,
officers, or directors directly responsible for the provider’s
service contract business, in the immediately preceding ten
years by a regulatory agency or state attorney general in any
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-16- nls/ko 16/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
jurisdiction.
2. The application shall be accompanied by all of the
following:
a. A license fee in the amount of five hundred dollars.
b. A fee in the amount of thirty-five dollars for each motor
vehicle service contract form provided pursuant to subsection
1, paragraph “g”.
3. If the application for a service company license contains
the information under subsection 1, is accompanied by the fees
under subsection 2, and the commissioner has not denied the
application pursuant to section 523C.9, the commissioner shall
issue the license to the applicant.
4. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited
into the service company oversight fund as provided in section
523C.24.
Sec. 22. Section 523C.4, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
523C.4 License expiration and renewal.
1. A license issued under this chapter shall be valid for a
period of one year. A license that is not renewed prior to the
expiration date shall be deemed expired. Prior to a license
expiration date, and if a renewal application was submitted at
least fourteen calendar days prior to the license expiration
date, the commissioner may extend the renewal period for an
additional thirty calendar days.
2. An application for license renewal shall include the
information required for an initial license as described in
section 523C.3, subsection 1, paragraphs “a” through “f”,
and a list of each service contract form the service company
continues to use, offer for sale, or issue in the state,
including the service contract form name, number, and the date
the form was last revised.
3. The license renewal application shall be accompanied by
all of the following:
a. A license renewal fee in the amount of two hundred
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-17- nls/ko 17/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
dollars.
b. A fee in the amount of three percent of the aggregate
amount of payments the service company received for the sale
or issuance of residential service contracts in this state
during the period beginning on the date the service company’s
license was issued until the date of the service company’s
renewal filing, provided that such fee shall be no less than
one hundred dollars and no greater than fifty thousand dollars.
c. A fee in the amount of thirty-five dollars for each motor
vehicle service contract form filed with the commissioner that
the service company continues to use, offer for sale, or issue
in the state.
d. The number of motor vehicle service contracts and the
number of residential service contracts issued during the
immediately preceding calendar year by the service company in
this state.
e. The number of motor vehicle service contracts and the
number of residential service contracts canceled during the
immediately preceding calendar year by the service company in
this state.
f. The total dollar amount of refunds issued to service
contract holders by the service company during the immediately
preceding calendar year for canceled motor vehicle service
contracts in this state, and the total dollar amount of refunds
issued to service contract holders by the service company
during the immediately preceding calendar year for canceled
residential service contracts in this state.
g. The total dollar amount of motor vehicle service contract
fees, and the total dollar amount of residential service
contract fees, collected during the immediately preceding
calendar year by the service company for contracts sold in this
state.
h. The number of claims filed with the service company
for motor vehicle service contracts in this state during
the immediately preceding calendar year, and the number of
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-18- nls/ko 18/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
claims filed with the service company for residential service
contracts in this state during the immediately preceding
calendar year.
i. The total dollar amount of claims paid by the service
company for motor vehicle service contracts sold by the service
company in this state during the immediately preceding calendar
year, and the total dollar amount of claims paid by the service
company for residential service contracts sold by the service
company in this state during the immediately preceding calendar
year.
j. The total number of claims during the immediately
preceding calendar year for motor vehicle service contracts
in this state that did not result in repair, replacement,
payment, or other thing of value to the service contract
holder by the service company, and the total number of claims
during the immediately preceding calendar year for residential
service contracts in this state that did not result in repair,
replacement, payment, or other thing of value to the service
contract holder by the service company.
k. The total number of written complaints regarding motor
vehicle service contracts received by the service company
during the immediately preceding calendar year, and the
total number of written complaints regarding residential
service contracts received by the service company during the
immediately preceding calendar year, including complaints
received directly from a consumer, indirectly on behalf of a
consumer from a third party other than a regulatory agency, and
from a regulatory agency.
l. The number of lawsuits filed by a third party or a
regulatory agency, against the service company during the
immediately preceding calendar year regarding service contracts
issued, offered for sale, or sold by the service company.
4. If the license renewal application complies with this
section, and the commissioner has not refused to renew the
license pursuant to section 523C.9, the commissioner shall
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-19- nls/ko 19/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
renew the license. If the commissioner refuses renewal of a
license pursuant to section 523C.9, the refusal shall be in
writing setting forth the grounds for the refusal.
5. If a service company submits a license renewal
application after the license has expired, the service company
shall pay a reinstatement fee of eight hundred dollars, and
applicable fees pursuant to subsection 3.
6. a. A service company whose license has expired, and is
not within an additional thirty-day extension period granted
by the commissioner pursuant to section 523C.4, subsection 1,
shall not offer, extend, or renew a service contract until the
service company’s license has been renewed, or the service
company has been issued a new license.
b. If, at the time a service contract is issued or sold in
this state, the service company has an expired license that is
not within an additional thirty-day extension period granted
by the commissioner pursuant to section 523C.4, subsection 1,
the service contract may be canceled at the discretion of the
service contract holder. If a service contract holder chooses
to cancel a service contract, the full purchase price of the
service contract, less any claims paid, shall be refunded to
the service contract holder within thirty calendar days. A ten
percent penalty shall be added each month to the refund if the
refund is not paid to the service contract holder within the
thirty calendar days.
Sec. 23. Section 523C.7, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
523C.7 Disclosure to service contract holders —— contract
form —— required provisions.
1. A service contract shall not be issued, sold, or offered
for sale in this state unless the service company does all of
the following:
a. Provides a receipt for the purchase of the service
contract to the service contract holder.
b. Provides a complete sample copy of the service contract
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-20- nls/ko 20/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
to the consumer prior to purchase. A service company may
comply with this paragraph by providing the consumer with a
complete electronic sample copy of the service contract, or
directing the consumer to a complete sample copy of the service
contract at an internet site. A paper copy of the sample
service contract shall be provided upon the request of the
consumer at the expense of the service company.
c. Provides a fully executed paper or electronic copy of
the service contract to the service contract holder within ten
calendar days of the date the service contract holder purchased
the service contract. A paper copy of the executed service
contract shall be provided to the service contract holder upon
request of the service contract holder at the expense of the
service company.
2. A service contract issued, sold, or offered for sale
in the state shall comply with all of the following, as
applicable:
a. A service contract shall be written in clear,
understandable language in at least ten point type.
b. (1) A service contract insured by a reimbursement
insurance policy as provided in section 523C.5, subsection 1,
shall include a statement in substantially the following form:
Obligations of the service company under this service contract
are guaranteed under a reimbursement insurance policy. If the
service company fails to pay or provide service on a claim
within sixty days after proof of loss has been filed with
the service company, the service contract holder is entitled
to make a claim directly against the reimbursement insurance
policy.
(2) A service contract insured by a reimbursement insurance
policy shall conspicuously state the name and address of the
issuer of the reimbursement insurance policy for that service
contract. A claim against a reimbursement insurance policy
shall also include a claim for return of any refund due in
accordance with paragraphs “m” and “n”.
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-21- nls/ko 21/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
c. A service contract not insured under a reimbursement
insurance policy shall contain a statement in substantially the
following form:
Obligations of the service company under this service contract
are backed by the full faith and credit of the service company
and are not guaranteed under a reimbursement insurance policy.
d. A service contract shall state the name and address of
the service company obligated to perform services under the
contract, and shall conspicuously identify the service company,
any third-party administrator, and the service contract holder
to the extent that the name and address of the service contract
holder has been furnished. The identities of such parties
shall not be required to be printed on the contract in advance
and may be added to the contract at the time of sale.
e. A service contract shall clearly state the total purchase
price of the service contract and the terms under which the
service contract is sold. The total purchase price shall not
be required to be printed on the contract in advance and may be
added to the contract at the time of sale.
f. If prior approval of repair work is required, a service
contract shall conspicuously describe the procedure for
obtaining prior approval and for making a claim, including a
toll-free telephone number for claim service, and the procedure
for obtaining emergency repairs performed outside of normal
business hours.
g. A service contract shall clearly state any waiting period
applicable to coverage under the service contract, and the date
on which coverage begins.
h. A service contract shall clearly state the existence of
any deductible amount.
i. A service contract shall specify the merchandise
or services, or both, to be provided and any limitations,
exceptions, or exclusions.
j. A service contract shall clearly state the conditions on
which the use of substitute parts or services will be allowed.
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-22- nls/ko 22/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Such conditions shall comply with applicable state and federal
laws.
k. A service contract shall clearly state any terms,
restrictions, or conditions governing the transferability of
the service contract.
l. A service contract shall clearly state the instructions
for cancellation of the service contract by the service
contract holder. Cancellation instructions shall include all
necessary information for a service contract holder to complete
a cancellation. Cancellation instructions shall include the
phone number, email address, or mailing address necessary for
the cancellation of the service contract, as well as any other
information that the service contract holder must use to cancel
the contract. A service company shall accept cancellation of a
service contract from a service contract holder by telephone,
email, or mail, or any other cost-effective and accessible
method of communication. The method of cancellation utilized
by a service company for the cancellation of a service contract
shall be as accessible as the method utilized by the service
company for the service contract holder to enter into the
service contract.
m. A service contract shall clearly state the terms and
conditions governing the cancellation of the contract prior
to the termination or expiration date of the contract by the
service company or the service contract holder. If the service
company cancels the contract, the service company shall mail a
written notice of termination to the service contract holder at
least fifteen calendar days before the date of the termination.
Prior notice of cancellation by the service company shall not
be required if the reason for cancellation is nonpayment of the
purchase price, a material misrepresentation by the service
contract holder to the service company or the support services
for the service company, or a substantial breach of duty by the
service contract holder relating to the covered product or use
of the covered product. The notice of cancellation shall state
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-23- nls/ko 23/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the effective date of the cancellation and the reason for the
cancellation. If a service contract is canceled by the service
company for any reason other than nonpayment of the purchase
price, the service company shall refund the service contract
holder in an amount equal to one hundred percent of the
unearned purchase price paid, calculated on a pro rata basis
based upon elapsed time or mileage, less any claims paid. The
service company may also charge a reasonable administrative fee
in an amount no greater than ten percent of the total purchase
price. A ten percent penalty shall be added each month to the
refund if the refund is not paid to the service contract holder
within thirty calendar days.
n. (1) A service contract shall permit the original
service contract holder who purchased the contract to cancel
the service contract within at least thirty calendar days of
the effective date of the service contract, provided no claims
have been paid under the service contract, or within a longer
period of time as permitted under the service contract. If
a claim has not been paid under the service contract prior
to cancellation by the service contract holder, the service
contract is void and the full purchase price of the service
contract shall be refunded to the service contract holder. A
ten percent penalty shall be added each month to a refund if
the refund is not paid to the service contract holder within
thirty calendar days, unless the service contract holder fails
to provide the information required by the service contract to
complete the cancellation.
(2) If the service contract holder cancels the service
contract in violation of subparagraph (1), the service company
shall refund the service contract holder an amount equal to one
hundred percent of the unearned purchase price paid, calculated
on a pro rata basis based upon elapsed time or mileage,
less any claims paid. The service company may also charge a
reasonable administrative fee in an amount no greater than ten
percent of the total purchase price. A ten percent penalty
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-24- nls/ko 24/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
shall be added each month to a refund if the refund is not paid
to the service contract holder within thirty calendar days of
the service contract cancellation request, unless the service
contract holder fails to provide the information required in
the service contract to complete the cancellation.
o. A service contract shall set forth all obligations
and duties of the service contract holder, including but not
limited to the duty to protect against any further damage, and
the obligation to follow an owner’s manual and to perform, or
have performed, all required service or maintenance.
p. A service contract shall clearly state if the contract
covers or excludes consequential damages and preexisting
conditions, if applicable. A service contract may, but is not
required to, cover damage resulting from rust, corrosion, or
damage caused by a part or system not covered under the service
contract.
q. A service contract shall clearly state the service call
fee, if any, charged to the service contract holder.
r. A service contract shall state the name and address of
the commissioner, the current toll-free telephone number of the
division, and a statement that a consumer may file a complaint
with the division, including by filing a complaint on the
division’s internet site.
s. If a residential service contract relates to heating,
cooling, plumbing, or electrical service, and the claim being
made by the service contract holder is essential to the health
and safety of the service contract holder or, if applicable,
the service contract holder’s family, the service company shall
ensure all of the following:
(1) Repair or replacement of the essential good commences
within forty-eight hours after the report of the claim, and is
completed as soon as reasonably practicable.
(2) If the service company determines that the service
company cannot complete a repair, replacement, or service
within three calendar days after the report of the claim,
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-25- nls/ko 25/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the service contract holder may seek an outside provider to
complete the repair, replacement, or service. The service
company shall cover reasonable costs associated with a repair,
replacement, or service completed by an outside service
provider up to the maximum dollar amount covered by the service
contract.
(3) Notice is provided to the service contract holder if a
repair cannot practicably be completed within three calendar
days after the report of the claim. The service company shall
provide a status report to the service contract holder by
communicating in a verifiable manner as soon as practicable,
but no later than three calendar days after the date of the
report of the claim. The status report must include all of the
following:
(a) A list of all required repairs, replacements, or
services and the estimated cost to the service contract holder.
(b) The primary reason the required repair, replacement, or
service will take longer than three calendar days, including
the status of all parts required for the repair, replacement,
or service.
(c) The current estimated length of time to complete the
repair, replacement, or service.
(d) The telephone number of the service company in the
event the service contract holder or the commissioner wants
to make an inquiry concerning the claim, and a commitment by
the service company to respond to an inquiry no later than one
business day after the date the inquiry is received.
(e) A statement that if the service contract holder is not
satisfied with the manner in which the service company handles
the claim under the terms of service contract, the service
contract holder may file a complaint with the division pursuant
to paragraph “r”.
(f) A notice to the service contract holder that the
service contract holder may seek an outside service provider
to complete the repair, replacement, or service, and that the
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-26- nls/ko 26/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
service company will cover reasonable costs associated with a
repair, replacement, or service completed by an outside service
provider up to the maximum dollar amount covered by the service
contract.
Sec. 24. NEW SECTION. 523C.8 Service contract forms ——
fees.
1. A service company shall file with the division an
accurate copy of each service contract form prior to using the
service contract form for the sale of a service contract in
this state.
2. At the time of filing each motor vehicle service contract
form with the division a service company shall pay a fee in the
amount of thirty-five dollars for each motor vehicle service
contract form.
3. Notwithstanding section 523C.7, a service company may
continue to use a service contract form that is noncompliant
with this chapter until June 30, 2026, provided no changes are
made to the service contract form and the service contract form
was filed with the division in 2024.
Sec. 25. Section 523C.9, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
523C.9 License denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation.
1. The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of,
deny an application for a license from, or refuse to renew the
license of, a service company, or may levy a civil penalty as
provided in section 523C.13 against a service company, for any
of the following reasons:
a. The service company violated this chapter, a lawful
order, regulation, or subpoena.
b. The service company failed to pay a final judgment
rendered against the service company in this state within sixty
calendar days after the date the judgment became final.
c. The service company, without just cause, refused
to perform, or negligently or incompetently performed, a
service required to be performed under the service company’s
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-27- nls/ko 27/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
service contracts and the refusal, or negligent or incompetent
performance, has occurred with such frequency as to indicate
the general business practices of the service company are
negligent or incompetent, as determined by the commissioner.
d. The service company violated section 523C.13.
e. The service company failed to demonstrate financial
responsibility pursuant to section 523C.5, if applicable.
f. The service company failed to maintain a corporate
certificate of good standing with the secretary of state.
g. The service company provided incorrect, misleading,
incomplete, or materially untrue information in the service
company’s license application.
h. The service company obtained or attempted to obtain a
license through misrepresentation or fraud.
i. The service company improperly withheld, misappropriated,
or converted any money or property received in the course of
business as a service company.
j. The service company intentionally misrepresented the
terms of an actual or proposed service contract.
k. Within the immediately preceding ten years, an owner,
officer, or director of the service company has been convicted
of a criminal offense involving any aspect of a business
involving securities, commodities, investments, franchises,
insurance, banking, or finance.
l. An owner, officer, or director of the service company
has been convicted of a criminal offense involving dishonesty
or a false statement, including but not limited to fraud,
theft, misappropriation of funds, falsification of documents,
deceptive acts or practices, or other related offenses.
m. The service company admitted to committing, or was found
to have committed, any unfair trade practice or fraud.
n. The service company used fraudulent, coercive,
or dishonest practices, or demonstrated incompetence,
untrustworthiness, or financial irresponsibility, in conducting
business in this state or any other state.
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-28- nls/ko 28/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
o. The service company had a service company license or its
equivalent, denied, suspended, or revoked in any other state,
province, district, or territory.
p. The service company failed, or refused, to cooperate in
an investigation conducted by the commissioner of insurance.
2. If the commissioner suspends or revokes the license of,
denies the application for licensure of, or refuses to renew
the license of, a service company pursuant to this section, the
commissioner shall notify the service company, in writing, and
provide the reason for the suspension, revocation, denial, or
nonrenewal. The licensee or applicant may request a hearing
on the suspension, revocation, nonrenewal, or denial, and a
hearing shall be conducted according to section 507B.6.
Sec. 26. Section 523C.12, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
523C.12 Optional examination Examinations.
The commissioner, or a the commissioner’s designee, of
the commissioner may make an examination of the books and
records of a service company, including records involving
communications with service contract holders, copies of
contracts and records of claims and expenditures, and
verify its records related to the service company’s assets,
liabilities, and reserves. The actual costs of the examination
shall be borne by the service company. The costs of an
examination under this section shall not exceed an amount equal
to ten percent of the service company’s reported net income
associated with doing business in the state in the previous
immediately preceding fiscal year.
Sec. 27. Section 523C.13, Code 2025, is amended by striking
the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
523C.13 Prohibited acts or practices —— penalty —— violations
—— contracts voided.
1. A service company, or the service company’s support
services, that offers service contracts for sale in this state,
shall not, directly or indirectly, represent in any manner,
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-29- nls/ko 29/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
whether by written solicitation or telemarketing, a false,
deceptive, or misleading statement with respect to any of the
following:
a. The service company’s affiliation with a motor vehicle
manufacturer or importer.
b. The validity or expiration of a warranty.
c. A motor vehicle service contract holder’s coverage
under a motor vehicle service contract, including statements
suggesting that the service contract holder must purchase a
new service contract in order to maintain coverage under the
existing service contract or warranty.
d. Descriptions of the service contract as a “policy”.
2. A licensed service company which offers service
contracts for sale in this state shall not, directly or
indirectly, do any of the following:
a. Fail to complete, or fail to ensure the completion of, a
repair, maintenance, replacement, service, or indemnification
of expenses associated with a covered claim within a reasonable
period of time.
b. Create or use any advertising that does not include the
name of the licensed service company.
c. Use any method of marketing that may induce the purchase
of a service contract through force, fear, or threats, whether
explicit or implied.
d. Create or use any service contract marketing materials
that contain incorrect or misleading information.
e. Use, offer for sale, or issue in this state a service
contract form that has not been submitted as part of a license
application pursuant to section 523C.3, as part of a license
application renewal pursuant to section 523C.4, or submitted
to the division during the service company’s current license
period.
3. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 17A that regulate service contracts to prohibit
misrepresentation, false advertising, defamation, boycotts,
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-30- nls/ko 30/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
coercion, intimidation, false statements and entries, and
unfair discrimination or practices. If the commissioner finds
that a person has violated rules adopted under this section,
the commissioner may order any or all of the following:
a. Payment of a civil penalty of not more than one thousand
dollars for each act or violation, not to exceed an aggregate
of ten thousand dollars, unless the person knew or reasonably
should have known the person was in violation of this section,
in which case the civil penalty shall be not more than five
thousand dollars for each act or violation, not to exceed an
aggregate of fifty thousand dollars in any one consecutive
six-month period. If the commissioner finds a violation of
this section was directed, encouraged, condoned, ignored,
or ratified by the employer of the person the commissioner
may assess the penalty to the employer and not the person.
Any civil penalties collected under this subsection shall be
deposited as provided in section 505.7.
b. Suspension or revocation of the person’s license, if the
person knew or reasonably should have known the person was in
violation of this section.
4. A violation of this chapter shall constitute an unlawful
practice pursuant to section 714.16.
5. A person shall not engage, directly or indirectly, in any
unfair method of competition, or an unfair or deceptive act or
practice, in the business of service contracts. Any violation
of this chapter constitutes an unfair method of competition,
or an unfair or deceptive act or practice. If, after hearing,
the commissioner determines that a person has engaged in an
unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or
practice, the provisions of sections 507B.6 through 507B.8
shall apply.
Sec. 28. Section 523C.22, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
523C.22 Claim procedures.
A licensed service company shall promptly provide a written
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-31- nls/ko 31/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
explanation to the service contract holder, describing the
reasons for denying a claim or for the offer of a compromise
settlement, based on all relevant facts or legal requirements
and referring to applicable provisions of the service contract.
The written explanation shall provide instructions to the
service contract holder on the process for an appeal, second
review, arbitration, or similar provisions included in the
contract, as well as information on how to file a complaint
with the division, including the internet site on which to
locate the division’s complaint form.
Sec. 29. Section 523C.23, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 30. Section 523C.23, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. Except as provided in section 523C.19, a A proceeding
instituted under this chapter shall be conducted pursuant to
chapter 17A and rules adopted by the commissioner pursuant to
chapter 17A.
Sec. 31. NEW SECTION. 523C.25 Confidentiality.
1. Notwithstanding chapter 22, the commissioner shall
maintain the confidentiality of information submitted to
the division or obtained by the division in the course of
an investigation, examination, or inquiry pursuant to this
chapter, including all notes, work papers, or other documents.
Information obtained by the commissioner in the course of
investigating a complaint or inquiry may, at the discretion
of the commissioner, be provided to the service company that
is the subject of the complaint or inquiry and the consumer
who filed the complaint or inquiry, without waiving the
confidentiality afforded to the commissioner or to any other
person by this section. The commissioner may disclose or
release information that is otherwise confidential under this
subsection in the course of an administrative or judicial
proceeding.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, if the commissioner
LSB 1437XD (15) 91
-32- nls/ko 32/40

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
determines that it is necessary in the public interest, the
commissioner may share information with other regulatory
authorities or government agencies, or may publish service
company-related data or information collected under this
chapter. Such information may be redacted so that neither
personally identifiable information nor service company
identifiable information is made available.
Sec. 32. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. r. It is an unlawful practice for a person
to violate chapter 523C.
Sec. 33. REPEAL. Section 523C.19, Code 2025, is repealed.